Utah statutes.
26-53-301.   Removal of child suspected of sustaining concussion or a traumatic head injury -- Medical clearance required before return to participation.

(1)  An amateur sports organization, and each agent of the amateur sports organization, shall:

(a)  immediately remove a child from participating in a sporting event of the amateur sports organization if the child is suspected of sustaining a concussion or a traumatic head injury; and

(b)  prohibit the child described in Subsection (1)(a) from participating in a sporting event of the amateur sports organization until the child:

(i)  is evaluated by a qualified health care provider who is trained in the evaluation and management of a concussion; and

(ii)  provides the amateur sports organization with a written statement from the qualified health care provider described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) stating that:

(A)  the qualified health care provider has, within three years before the day on which the written statement is made, successfully completed a continuing education course in the evaluation and management of a concussion; and

(B)  the child is cleared to resume participation in the sporting event of the amateur sports organization.

(2)  This section does not create a new cause of action.



Enacted by Chapter 97, 2011 General Session

